Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2711
Clerk; liable for fees; accounting; indigent person; waiver of fees, when.

It shall be the duty of the clerk of the court to demand the payment of all fees in advance in civil cases. He or she shall be charged with all fees earned by the court and shall be required to account for the same. Upon written application by and such evidence as the court may require from an indigent person, the clerk of the court may be directed, by a judge of the court by a written order, to file all necessary pleadings and to issue necessary process thereon to meet the requirements of justice, in which case no fees shall be charged and collected by the clerk of the court from such person except upon final order or judgment in the action, and in that case the clerk shall not be charged with the fees in the case and required to account for the same unless the same are collected by him or her.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 31;

Laws 1988, LB 370, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 24-531.

Unclaimed witness fees, disposition, see sections 33-140 to 33-140.03.